patterns/hyph.la.classical.ec.txt
.ab1
.ab3au
.ab3áu
.ab3áv
.abe4
.ab3er
.ab3es
.abé2
.ab3és
.abi2
.ab3i4n
.ab3is
.abi4u
.abi4v
.abí2
.abí4n
.abo2
.abó2
.ab3u
.ad3á
.ade4
.ad3er
.ad3es
.adé2
.ad3ér
.ad3és
.ad3ib
.ad3i4c
.ad3ie
.ad3ié
.adi4m
.ad3i4n
.ad3i4q
.ad3is
.ad3i4t
.adi4u
.ad3i4v
.adí4c
.adí4m
.ad3í4n
.ad3í4q
.ad3ís
.adí4t
.ad3í4u
.ad3í4v
.ad6ora.
.ad6orane
.ad6oraq
.ad6oraue.
.ad6orave.
.ad6ó6ra.
.adó4ro
.ad3us
.adú2
.ae2a
.ae4st
.ag2n
.aí2
.aí3b
.am4bi.
.am4b5i4n
.am4b5i4q
.am6b5is.
.am6b5isn
.am6b5isq
.am6b5isu
.am6b5isv
.ambi6ue
.amb6iui.
.amb6iuin
.amb6iuiq
.amb6iuiu
.amb6iuín
.amb6iuíq
.amb6iuíu
.ambi6ve
.amb6ivi.
.amb6ivin
.amb6iviq
.amb6iviv
.amb6ivín
.amb6ivíq
.amb6ivív
.am4bí4n
.am4bí4q
.am4bís
.am6bí6ue
.am6bí6ve
.am4bú
.an6t5ea.
.ante5i4
.ante5í4
.as2c
.as4ta
.as4tá
.as4te
.as4té
.as4to
.as4tó
.as6trar
.as6trat
.as6trár
.as6trás
.as4tru
.ate2
.áb1
.ába2
.áb3au
.áb3av
.ábe4
.ábi2
.ád1
.áde4
.ád3es
.ád3ie
.ád3is
.ád3i4t
.áes3
.áes5t
.ám4bi.
.ám4b5is
.án4ter
.ás4ta
.ás4te
.ás4to
.ás4tru
.æs3t
.ba3g
.ba4ia.
.ba4iae
.ba4iam
.ba6iane.
.ba4iaq
.ba4iar
.ba4ias
.ba4iau
.ba4iav
.ba4iáe
.ba4iám
.ba6iáne.
.ba4iáq
.ba4iár
.ba4iás
.ba4iáu
.ba4iáv
.ba4ii
.ba4ií
.bi3
.ca3ru
.catá3
.cá2i
.cen3s
.ci6sté
.co3i4
.coí4
.con5i4c
.co4ní4c
.có4mit
.có4n5i4c
.de3d
.de4met
.des2
.deu4ta
.deu4tá
.dé3s2
.di3g
.di4r5e4m
.di4r5é4m
.dis6cendam
.dis6cendas
.dis6cendám
.dis6cendás
.dis6cendi
.dis6cendí
.dis6cendo.
.dis6cendon
.dis6cendoq
.dis6cendou
.dis6cendov
.dis6cendón
.dis6cendóq
.dis6cendóu
.dis6cendóv
.dis6céndam
.dis6céndas
.dis6cénde
.dis6céndi
.dis6céndo.
.dis6tau
.dis6tav
.do3l
.dó3l
.ed2
.ed4i
.ed4o
.ei2
.er2e
.ere5x4
.et3i
.eu3t
.ex3éq
.ex3i4
.ex3í4
.ex3u4
.exú4
.ét1
.ét3e2
.ét3i
.éx1
.éxi2
.he1
.hemi3
.hi6ste
.hi6str
.id3eo
.id3í
.id3ue
.ie3su
.ié3su
.ig4nar
.ig4nár
.ig4nó
.in1
.in3a4
.in3á4
.in3e4
.in3é2
.in3i4
.iní4
.in3o4
.inó4
.in3t
.inte6re6ri
.inte6re6rí
.inte6res
.inte6rés
.inte6ri.
.inte6rimus
.inte6rimús
.inte6rin
.inte6riq
.inte6ris
.inte6rit.
.inte6rite
.inte6riti
.inte6rití
.inte6ritn
.inte6rito.
.inte6riton
.inte6ritoq
.inte6ritot
.inte6ritou
.inte6ritov
.inte6ritón
.inte6ritóq
.inte6ritót
.inte6ritóu
.inte6ritóv
.inte6ritq
.inte6ritú
.inte6ritv
.inte6rí
.interí6n
.interí6q
.interí6t
.inté6re6ri
.inté6ri6te
.inté6ri6ti
.inté6ri6to.
.inu4d
.in3ue
.in3ui
.in3uí
.in3us
.inú4d
.io3s4
.ió3s2
.is5ta
.is5te
.is5ti
.is5tí
.is3tr
.íd3eo
.ín1
.íne4
.íni2
.ín3t
.ín3ui
.jo3s4
.jó3s2
.li4g5n
.lino3
.linó3
.líg3n
.lí3t
.ma3ge
.magnæ6u
.magnæ6v
.ne1
.ne3q
.ne5s4c
.neu4t
.ne3xo
.né1
.nés2
.né5ute
.nob2
.no6ste
.oba2
.ob3e4r
.ob3es
.ob3é2
.obi2
.ob3i4n
.ob3is
.obi4u
.obi4v
.obí4
.obo2
.oc4té
.ordí3
.os3t
.ób1
.pa4r5ui
.pa4r5uí
.pá4rui
.pe2r
.per3a
.pera4r
.peras5
.peræ4q
.pere4
.per5eá
.per5em
.per5eo
.per5eó
.per5es
.peré4
.per5ém
.per5és
.pe6riens
.per6iere.
.per6ierene
.per6iereq
.per6iereu
.per6ierev
.per6ieris
.per6ierís
.per5iérim
.per5iérit
.per5iéru
.per5ii
.per5ií
.pe5rille
.pe5r6illi
.pe5rillí
.pe5rimin
.per6imini
.per6iminí
.pe5rimur
.per5i6mus
.pe5rimúr
.per5i6mús
.per5ine
.per5i4q
.peri6re.
.per5i6rem.
.pe5riremi
.per5i6remn
.per5i6remq
.per5i6remue
.pe5riremur
.per5i6remus
.pe5riremúr
.per5i6remús
.per5i6remv
.peri6rene
.per5i6rent.
.per5i6rentn
.per5i6rentq
.per5i6rentue
.pe5rirentur
.pe5rirentú
.per5i6rentv
.peri6req
.pe5rirer
.per5i6res
.peri6ret
.per5iret.
.per5ireti
.per5iretí
.per5iretn
.per5iretq
.per5iretue
.per5iretv
.peri6reu
.peri6rev
.pe5rirémi
.per5i6rémn
.per5i6rémq
.per5i6rémue
.pe5rirémur
.per5i6rémus
.per5i6rémv
.per5i6réntn
.per5i6réntq
.per5i6réntue
.pe5riréntur
.per5i6réntv
.pe5rirér
.per5i6rés
.peri6rét
.per5iréti
.per5irétn
.per5irétq
.per5irétue
.per5irétv
.pe5riri
.pe5rirí
.per5isse.
.per5issem
.per5issen
.per5isseq
.per5isses
.per5isset
.pe6r5isseue
.per5issev
.per5issém
.per5issén
.per5issés
.per5issét
.per5isti
.per5istí
.per5it.
.peri6ta
.peri6tá
.peri6tæ
.peri6te
.peri6ti.
.peri6tin
.peri6tiq
.peri6tis.
.peri6tisn
.peri6tisq
.peri6tisu
.peri6tisv
.peri6tiue
.peri6tiv
.peri6tín
.peri6tíq
.peri6tísn
.peri6tísq
.peri6tísu
.peri6tísv
.peri6tíu
.peri6tív
.per5itn
.peri6to.
.peri6ton
.peri6toq
.pe5ritor.
.pe5ritorn
.pe5ritorq
.pe5ritorue
.peri6torum
.peri6torú
.pe5ritorv
.peri6tos
.per5i6tot
.peri6tou
.peri6tov
.peri6tón
.peri6tóq
.pe5ritórn
.pe5ritórq
.pe5ritórue
.peri6tórum
.pe5ritórv
.peri6tós
.per5i6tót
.peri6tóu
.peri6tóv
.per5itq
.peri6tu
.per5itue
.peri6tú
.per5itv
.per5i4u
.per5i4v
.per5íe
.pe5ríl
.pe5rímin
.pe5rímur
.per5í6mus
.perí4n
.per5íne
.per5í4q
.perí6re.
.per5í6rem
.perí6ren
.per5írent
.perí6req
.pe5rírer
.per5í6res
.per5í6ret
.perí6reu
.perí6rev
.pe5ríri
.per5íss
.per5ísti
.perí6tan
.perí6taq
.perí6tau
.perí6tav
.perí6te
.perí6tis
.per5ítn
.perí6to.
.pe5rítor
.per5ítq
.per5ítue
.per5ítv
.per5í4u
.per5í4v
.per5os
.per5ós
.per5uí
.pé3i
.pé4r3e
.pé4ri.
.pé4rie
.pé4r5ii
.pé4ris
.pé4r5i4t
.pi6str
.po6te6ris
.po6te6rís
.po6tes.
.po6tesn
.po6tesq
.po6tesu
.po6tesv
.po4tés
.pó4tes
.pule3
.pulé3
.ra3d4
.ra3i
.ra3m
.ra5ra
.ra5rá
.ras5t
.ra6ste
.rá3i
.ræ3
.re1
.re5dam.
.re5damq
.re5damu
.re5damv
.re5das
.red3e4
.re4dé
.re4di.
.re4d5ie
.re4d5ié
.re4d5ií
.re4d5i4m
.red5i4n
.re4d5i4q
.re6dis.
.re6disn
.re6disq
.red5iss
.red5ist
.re6disu
.re6disv
.re4d5i4t
.re4di6u
.red5iue
.redi6v
.red5ive
.re4d5í4m
.re4d5í4n
.re4d5í4q
.re6dísn
.re6dísq
.red5íss
.red5íst
.re6dísu
.re6dísv
.re4d5í4t
.re4d5í4u
.re4d5í4v
.re3ó
.rex2
.re5xi
.ré1
.ré4d3i4
.rés6tem
.rés6tes
.rés4to
.ris2
.ro3b2
.ro3d4
.ro5di
.rodi5u
.rodi5v
.ro4s3t
.ru3r
.ru4s
.sa3mu
.sá3mu
.se3iæ
.se3io
.se3ió
.se6mis.
.se6misn
.se6misq
.se6misue
.se6misv
.se6mísn
.se6mísq
.se6mísu
.se6mísv
.se3ps
.sé3i
.sé4mis
.sé3ps
.sér4ui
.si4l5ui
.si4l5uí
.si6str
.sí4lui
.supé6r5is
.te4ia
.te4iá
.te4ie
.te4ii
.te4ií
.te4io
.te4ió
.te4iú
.te3n4u
.te5re
.ter6it
.teri5tur
.te5ri5ue
.te5ri5v
.te3r4o
.té3n4u
.tran5s6ue.
.trán5s6ue.
.tro4ii
.tro4ií
.tro4i5q
.tro4is
.tro6iue
.tro4iv
.tro4í
.troí5u
.troí5v
.tró4ii
.ub2
.ueni4
.ue4ni.
.ue6niens
.ue6n5ier
.ue6niéns
.ue6n5iér
.ue4nim
.ue4nin
.ue4niq
.ue4nir
.ue4nis
.ue4nit
.ue6niue
.ue4ní4
.uen5íe
.ue6ste
.ué4ni.
.ué6niens
.ué4nis
.ué4nit
.ul3ui
.ul3uí
.um2e
.un3et
.uol6uere.
.uol6uerene
.uol6uereq
.uol6uereu
.uol6uit.
.uol6uitn
.uol6uitq
.uol6uitue
.uo6ste
.uól6ui.
.uól6uit.
.uu2
.úb2
.veni4
.ve4ni.
.ve6niens
.ve6n5ier
.ve6niéns
.ve6n5iér
.ve4nim
.ve4nin
.ve4niq
.ve4nir
.ve4nis
.ve4nit
.ve4niv
.ve4ní4
.ven5íe
.ve6ste
.vé4ni.
.vé6niens
.vé4nis
.vé4nit
.vo6ste
a1á2
2aba
aba3i
ab2aq
aba6ste
aba2u
ab3aui
ab3auí
ab3a2v
2abá
abá3i
abæ3
a2beú
2abé
ab2ia
ab2iá
a2b3i2b
ab3ice
3a2bie
ab4ies
ab4iet
3a2bié
ab4iés
ab4iét
a2b3ii
a2b3ií
ab3iss
ab3ist
abi4tot
abi4tót
a2b3í2b
a2bíe
ab3íer
a2bíi
ab3ímu
ab3íss
ab3íst
ab3íto
1abj
1a2bl
1abn
2abo
2abó
ab1r
ab3rá
1abs
ab2sq
ab4stem
ab4sti
ab4stó
ab4stru
ab4strú
abu2s
abu2t
ab5ute
2abú
5abúndat
5abúndem
5abúndes
5abúndet
abú2t
a3ca
a3cá
a3cæ
1acc
2a3ce.
2a3cen
2a3ceq
2a3ceu
2a3cev
2aci
a3cl
2a3co
aco3ni
2a3có
a2cut
a2cút
ad1
ad2ad
ad6amans
ad6amanté
ad6amanti.
ad6amantib
ad6amantin
ad6amantiq
ad6amantis
ad6amantiu
ad6amantiú
ad6amantiv
ad6amantín
ad6amantíq
ad6amantís
ad6amantíu
ad6amantív
ad6amas.
ad6amasn
ad6amasq
ad6amasu
ad6amasv
ad6amáns
ad6amánte
ad6amánti.
ad6amántib
ad6amántis
ad6amántiu
ad6amásn
ad6amásq
ad6amásu
ad6amásv
ad2an
a2dap
ada2q
ad2ar
ad3ác
adæ2
1add
ade4d
ade2g
ade2q
ade2s
adé2d
adé2g
adé2s
1adh
ad3iác
adi2g
adi4mí
adi2r
adí2g
adí4mu
adí2r
ad3íss
ad3íst
adí4to
1adj
1adn
ado2
ad4oc
adó6rans
adó6rant
adó4ras
adó4rat
adó4rem
adó6rent
adó4rer
adó4res
adó4ret
adó4ria
adó4ror
1adp
1ads
a2du4l
ad3u4r
a2dú2l
adú4r
ae1
2ae.
aea2b3
a3eamú
a3eant
ae3ác
a3eánt
ae3áp
ae4cue
1ae3d2
aed4o
2aee
ae2eo
ae2eó
ae3e2r
ae3es
ae2eu
aeé2r
ae3és
ae3g2
2aei2
ae3ic
2aeí
ae2ín
a2em
2aen
aení3t
2ae2o
2aeó
aepo6tes
aepo6tés
aepó6tes
ae3q
4aeque.
ae3r2
aer4a
aer4i
ae4rn
aer4o
ae4rq
ae4rv
aes2c
ae5sci
ae4s3cu
ae4s3cú
ae4spo
ae2sq
aes4te
aesti5t4
aestí5t4
aete6re6ri
aete6re6rí
aete6res
aete6rés
aete6ri.
aete6r5ii
aete6r5ií
aete6ri6m
aete6ri6n
aete6ri6q
aete6ri6t
aete6rí6m
aeter5ímu
aete6rí6n
aete6rí6q
aete6rí6t
aeter5íti
aete6rí6u
aete6rí6v
aeté6r5es
aeté6ri.
aeté6r5ii
aeté6rite
aeté6ri6ti
ae2un
2ae2ú
aex2
ae2xu
1af
afe4r
ag2a
a3gae
a3g2æ3
a2geb
a2ger
a2get
a2géb
a2gét
a2gim
agi6ste
agi6str
a2gím
a2gít
a2gn
ag3ne
ag3ni.
ag3nin
ag3niq
ag3nis
ag3niu
ag3niv
ag3nín
ag3níq
ag3nís
ag3níu
ag3nív
ag3no.
ag5norum
ag5norúm
ag5nos.
ag5nosn
ag5nosq
ag5nosu
ag5nosv
ag5noue.
ag5nove.
ag3nón
ag3nóq
ag5nórum
ag5nósn
ag5nósq
ag5nósu
ag5nósv
ag5nóue.
ag5nóve.
ag3nú
a3gri
a3grí
a2gun
a2gún
a1i
ai2a
aiad2
ai4an
ai2á
a2ieq
a2ieu
a2iev
ai2i
a2il
a2im
ai3me
ai3mi
ai3mí
ai3mo
ai3mó
a2in
ai2nu
a2ioc
aio2s
a2iq
a2iv
a1í2b
a1íi
a2í3me
a1í2r
a1í2t
a3la
alae2
a3lá
alæ2
2a3le
2a3lé
a3li.
a3lia
a3lib
a3lii
a3lií
a3lin
a3lio
a3lió
a3liq
a3lis
a3lit
a3liu
a3liú
a3liv
2a3lí
a2l3ua
a2l3uá
a2l3uæ
al3ue.
al3ueb
al3uem
al3uen
al3ueq
al3ues
al3uet
al3ueu
al3uéb
al3uém
al3uén
al3uéq
al3ués
al3uét
al3uéu
al3uin
al6uine.
a4l5uis.
a4l5uisn
a4l5uisq
a4l5uisu
a4l5uísn
a4l5uísq
a4l5uísu
a3lum
al3uó
a3lus
alu6ste
a3lut
al3uu
al3uú
2am.
6amantéa
6amantéæ
6amantée
6amantéi
6amantéo
6amantéu
1amb
amb3és
am4b5i4mu
am4b5i4mú
am4b5it.
am6b5i6te.
am6b5i6ten
am6b5i6teq
am6b5i6teu
am6b5i6tev
am4b5i4tí
am4b5itn
am4bi4to
am4b5i4tó
am4b5itq
am6b5itue
am4bitú
am4b5itv
am6bivi.
am4bít
am4b3u4r
am4b3us
am4bú4r
amb3ús
am2e
ame3g
am4es
ame3sæ
am2é
am4és
amé3sa
2am2i
3amic
a4mica
a4micá
a4micæ
a4mico
a4micó
amis3
ami6ste
ami6str
3a2míc
2amn
3amnæ
4amne
a1mo
a2móe
1amœ
1amp
ampo4s
2amq
2a1mu
am4uel
am2ué
a2mui
a2m3uí
2amú
2amv
2a3n2a
2a3ná
aná5str
2a3næ
1anc
an2cu
2and
ande4s3
2a3ne
a3nén
a3néq
a3néu
a3név
1anh
1ani
a2nim
a2ním
2a3n2o
2a3nó
2ans1
an2sa2
ansab3
ansabi4
ansabí4
an4sá4b3
an4sci
an4scí
an4sea
an4seá
an4seo
an4seó
an4si4b
an4sig
ansi4mi
an4si4t
ansi4u
an4si4v
an4sí4b
an4síe
an4síg
an4sí4m
an4sí4t
ansí4ui
ansí4vi
an4sn
an2sp
an4sq
ans3t
an4sv
2ant.
ante5re
an4t5ero
an4t5e4ró
antes4t
ante5stem.
ante5stemn
ante5stemq
ante5stemue
ante5stemv
ante5stes
ante5stémn
ante5stémq
ante5stémue
ante5stémv
ante5stés
anté5ii
antés4t
anté5stem
anté5stes
2antn
2antq
2antu
2antú
2antv
2an2u
a2n3ue
2a3nú
a2one
ao3ni
ao2ny
ao2ný
a1or
a3ó2ny
1ape
ape2i
ape3r4i
aper6im
aperi5n
aperí5tur
ape3r4u
2aph
a3pi
apis3
api6str
a3pí
ap3n
apo5str
apo4su
1app
appár4
a3pú
a2qua
a2quá
a3que.
a2quo
a2quó
a1r
2ar.
ar2a
arab2
a3rag
ar2á
1ard
ar2e
are2i
3a4resc
3a4résc
2ar2i
3arid
ari5do
2arí
3aríd
1arm
2arn
ar4or
aro2s
arpo4s
2arq
ar2sp
2aru
3a2r3ua
3a2r3uá
ar3uæ
ar3ue.
a4r3uen
a4r3ueq
ar4uer
a4r3ueu
ar4ui.
ar4uin
ar4uiq
ar4uis
ar5uis.
ar5uisn
ar5uisq
ar5uisu
ar4uiu
ar5uísn
ar5uísq
ar5uísu
4a3rum
ar4un
a2r3uo
a2r3uó
aru3sp
a2r3uu
a2r3uú
2a3rú
4arúm
arú3sp
2arv
3arva
3arvá
2as.
as6cende
as3ci
a3s2cr
a3se
ase2i
as4e3r
a3sé
a3s2i
a3sí
2asn
1asp
a3spá
as5per.
as5pera
as5perá
as5peræ
as5pere
as5peré
as5pe5ri
asperi5n
as5perí
as5perne.
as5pero
as5peró
as5perq
as5peru
as5perú
as5perv
as5péra
as6pérna
as5pérq
as5péru
as5pérv
as3pis
as3pís
as3po
aspo4s
as3pó
as3pum
as3púm
2as3q
2ass
2ast
as5te.
as5teq
as4ter
as5teu
as5tev
a4sti.
a4s3tin
a4stiq
a4stis
3astit
a4stiu
a4stiv
as3tí
a4stín
a4stíq
a4stís
3as4tít
a4stíu
a4stív
as4tras
as4trau
as5traue.
as4trav
as5trave.
as4trát
as4tráu
as4tráv
as4tríd
as5trum
as4trúe
as4trúi
2asu
a3s2ua
a4s3ue
as3uis
as3uís
2asv
2at.
2ata
at3a4g
ata5str
2atá
a2t3á4g
2atæ
2ate
ate4ie
ate4io
ate4ió
ate4iú
ate3r4a
ate5re
ate5ri
ateri5u
ateri5v
ate3ro
2até
2ati
ati4s
atis5t
2atí
2atn
2ato
ato2i
2ató
ató2i
2atq
1att
2atu
2atú
2atv
a1u
au5diu
2aue1
2a3ué
1aug
2aui
2auí
a2ul
a2u1m
a2un
aupe5re
aupe5ré
aupe5ri
auperi5n
auperi5q
auperi5ue
auperi5v
aupe5rí
a2ur
a2us
a2ut
1auu
a2ux
au2xu
2av
a3vé
1avu
ax2
a2xia
a2xiá
a2xiæ
a2xié
a2xii
a2xií
a2xio
a2xió
a2xiú
a2xía
a2xíe
ax3ue
áa2t
áb2ac
áb2aq
áb3aui
áb3avi
áb2eq
áb2ia
á2bie
áb4ies
á2b3ii
áb4iis
áb2iu
1á2bl
ábs2c
áb5sci
áb2sq
áb5s4te
áb4stin
áb3sto
áb4str
á3bu
2áce
áda2
ád6amans
ád4amas
1ádd
áde2d
1ádh
á2d3i2c
ádi2g
ádi4mi
ád2ip
ádi3pi
1ádj
1ádm
á3d2o
ádo4ri
1áds
á3eant
á3eat
áe4cue
áe3d2
áe2eo
áee2r
áe3g2
áei2
á2em
2áen
2áe3q
3áequa
5áequem
5áequer
5áeques
5áequet
3áequo
áe3r
áer4i
áes4ca
áes4ci
áe4spe
áes4ta
